Illinois, session 104th, SB1951.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is 5amended by adding Section 5-45.65 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 100/5-45.65 new)7    Sec. 5-45.65. Emergency rulemaking; Department of Natural 8Resources. To provide for the expeditious and timely 9implementation of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 10Assembly, emergency rules implementing the changes made to the 11Wildlife Code by this amendatory Act of the 104th General 12Assembly may be adopted in accordance with Section 5-45 by the 13Department of Natural Resources. The adoption of emergency 14rules authorized by Section 5-45 and this Section is deemed to 15be necessary for the public interest, safety, and welfare.16    This Section is repealed one year after the effective date 17of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 18    Section 10. The Wildlife Code is amended by changing 19Sections 1.4 and 2.30 as follows: 20    (520 ILCS 5/1.4)  (from Ch. 61, par. 1.4)21    Sec. 1.4. The Department is authorized to make rules and   SB1951- 2 -LRB104 12107 BDA 22206 b1regulations for carrying out, administering and enforcing the 2provisions of this Act. These rules and regulations shall be 3called and hereinafter referred to as administrative rules.4    Each rule shall be promulgated in accordance with the 5Illinois Administrative Procedure Act.6    A copy of any such rule, under the seal of the Department 7and certified by the Director thereof shall be received in 8evidence in all courts of this State with the same effect as 9the original.10    Such rules, after becoming effective, shall be enforced in 11the same manner as are any other provisions of this Act and 12violators thereof are subject to the penalties set out in 13Section 3.5 of this Act.14    The Department may adopt emergency rules in accordance 15with Sections 5-45 and 5-45.65. of the Illinois Administrative 16Procedure Act. The adoption of emergency rules authorized by 17Sections 5-45 and 5-45.65 of the Illinois Administrative 18Procedure Act and this paragraph is deemed to be necessary for 19the public interest, safety, and welfare. 20(Source: P.A. 91-357, eff. 7-29-99.) 21    (520 ILCS 5/2.30)  (from Ch. 61, par. 2.30)22    Sec. 2.30. Except as provided in this Section, it shall be 23unlawful for any person to trap or to hunt with gun, dog, dog 24and gun, or bow and arrow, gray fox, red fox, raccoon, weasel, 25mink, muskrat, badger, bobcat, and opossum except during the   SB1951- 3 -LRB104 12107 BDA 22206 b1open season which will be set annually by the Director between 212:01 a.m., November 1 to 12:00 midnight, February 15, both 3inclusive.4    Except as provided in this Section, it shall be unlawful 5for any person to trap or to hunt gray fox except during an 6open season, which may be set annually by the Director between 712:01 a.m., November 1 to 12:00 midnight, February 15, both 8inclusive. When the biological balance of the gray fox is 9affected for any reason, the Director may, by administrative 10rule, set the dates of, lengthen, shorten, or close the season 11during which gray fox may be taken. The Director may also set, 12lessen, or increase the daily bag limit or possession limit of 13gray fox by administrative rule. 14    It shall be unlawful for any person to hunt or trap bobcat 15in this State on and after the effective date of this 16amendatory Act of the 100th General Assembly in the counties 17of Boone, Bureau, Champaign, Cook, DeKalb, DeWitt, DuPage, 18Ford, Grundy, Henry, Iroquois, Kane, Kankakee, Kendall, Knox, 19Lake, LaSalle, Lee, Livingston, Logan, Marshall, McHenry, 20McLean, Ogle, Peoria, Piatt, Putnam, Stark, Stephenson, 21Vermilion, Will, Winnebago, and Woodford and north of U.S. 22Route 36 in Edgar and Douglas and north of U.S. Route 36 to the 23junction with Illinois Route 121 and north or east of Illinois 24Route 121 in Macon. For the season beginning in 2017, a total 25number of 350 bobcats may be hunted or trapped lawfully, or the 26conclusion of the season occurs, whichever is earlier. For the   SB1951- 4 -LRB104 12107 BDA 22206 b1season beginning in 2018, a total number of 375 bobcats may be 2hunted or trapped lawfully, or the conclusion of the season 3occurs, whichever is earlier. The changes added to this 4Section by this amendatory Act of the 100th General Assembly, 5except for this sentence, are inoperative on and after June 630, 2019. 7    It is unlawful to pursue any fur-bearing mammal with a dog 8or dogs between the hours of sunset and sunrise during the 10 9day period preceding the opening date of the raccoon hunting 10season and the 10 day period following the closing date of the 11raccoon hunting season except that the Department may issue 12field trial permits in accordance with Section 2.34 of this 13Act. A non-resident from a state with more restrictive 14fur-bearer pursuit regulations for any particular species than 15provided for that species in this Act may not pursue that 16species in Illinois except during the period of time that 17Illinois residents are allowed to pursue that species in the 18non-resident's state of residence. Hound running areas 19approved by the Department shall be exempt from the provisions 20of this Section.21    It shall be unlawful to take beaver, river otter, weasel, 22mink, or muskrat except during the open season set annually by 23the Director, and then, only with traps, except that a 24firearm, pistol, or air rifle of a caliber not larger than a 25.22 long rifle may be used to remove the animal from the trap. 26    It shall be unlawful for any person to trap beaver or river   SB1951- 5 -LRB104 12107 BDA 22206 b1otter with traps except during the open season which will be 2set annually by the Director between 12:01 a.m., November 1st 3and 12:00 midnight, March 31, both inclusive.4    Coyote may be taken by trapping methods only during the 5period from September 1 to March 1, both inclusive, and by 6hunting methods at any time.7    Striped skunk may be taken by trapping methods only during 8the period from September 1 to March 1, both inclusive, and by 9hunting methods at any time.10    Muskrat may be taken by trapping methods during an open 11season set annually by the Director. 12    For the purpose of taking fur-bearing mammals, the State 13may be divided into management zones by administrative rule.14    It shall be unlawful to take or possess more than the 15season limit or possession limit of fur-bearing mammals that 16shall be set annually by the Director. The season limit for 17bobcat shall not exceed one bobcat per permit. Possession 18limits shall not apply to fur buyers, tanners, manufacturers, 19and taxidermists, as defined by this Act, who possess 20fur-bearing mammals in accordance with laws governing such 21activities.22    Nothing in this Section shall prohibit the taking or 23possessing of fur-bearing mammals found dead or 24unintentionally killed by a vehicle along a roadway during the 25open season provided the person who possesses such fur-bearing 26mammals has all appropriate licenses, stamps, or permits; the   SB1951- 6 -LRB104 12107 BDA 22206 b1season for which the species possessed is open; and that such 2possession and disposal of such fur-bearing mammals is 3otherwise subject to the provisions of this Section. 4    The provisions of this Section are subject to modification 5by administrative rule. 6(Source: P.A. 102-837, eff. 5-13-22.) 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.